New Jersey, session 221, S3903.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2019, c.357 (C.17B:27A-6.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the board of the New Jersey Individual Health Coverage Program established pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-10) shall establish, by regulation, an annual open enrollment period during which time individuals are permitted to enroll in an individual health benefits plan and individuals who already have coverage may replace current coverage.  During any plan year in which the State is on the federally-facilitated exchange, the annual open enrollment period shall conform to federal requirements, unless the State is permitted to offer a longer open enrollment period.  During any plan year in which the State operates a State-based exchange, the open enrollment period shall be set by New Jersey's State-based exchange and shall not be less than 90 days. b.  (1)  The board shall establish a special enrollment period for an enrollee if a health care provider of an enrollee or a dependent becomes out-of-network during the enrollees current plan period. (2)   The enrollment period described pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be determined by the board and shall not be less than 30 calendar days. (3)   Information about the enrollment period described pursuant to this subsection, including the start and end dates, shall be communicated to enrollees by the carrier. (cf: P.L.2019, c.357, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment and shall apply to plans that are delivered, issued, executed, or renewed on or after that date.